Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 12 Applicability of Traffic Regulations

31-12-1.
Places provisions applicable.

The provisions of chapters 12 — 27 of this title relating to the operation of vehicles refer exclusively to the operation of vehicles upon highways and on all state, city or town owned public property except:

Where a different place is specifically referred to in a given section.

The provisions of chapter 26 of this title and §§

31-27-1

—

31-27-4

shall apply upon highways and elsewhere throughout the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-1

; P.L. 1971, ch. 286, § 1.

31-12-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-2

; Repealed by P.L. 1999, ch 218, § 6, effective July 1, 1999.

31-12-3.
Obedience to police officers.

No person shall willfully fail or refuse to comply with any lawful order or direction of any police officer invested by law with authority to direct, control, or regulate traffic, including any order or direction pertaining to fire lane parking violations whether on private or public property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-3

; P.L. 1983, ch. 159, § 1.

31-12-4.
Applicability to public vehicles.

The provisions of chapters 12 — 27 of this title applicable to the drivers of vehicles upon the highways shall apply to the drivers of all vehicles owned or operated by the United States, this state, or any county, city, town, district, or any other political subdivision of the state except as provided in §

31-12-5

, and subject to any specific exceptions as are set forth in these chapters with reference to authorized emergency vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-4

.

31-12-5.
Exemption of highway workers.

Unless specifically made applicable, the provisions of chapters 12 — 27 of this title shall not apply to persons, teams, motor vehicles, and other equipment while actually engaged in work upon the surface of a highway but shall apply to the persons and vehicles when traveling to or from this work.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-5

.

31-12-6.
Emergency vehicles — Times when entitled to special privileges.

The driver of an authorized emergency vehicle, when responding to an emergency call or when in the pursuit of an alleged violator of the law or when responding to but not upon returning from a fire alarm, may exercise the privileges set forth in §

31-12-7

, but subject to the conditions stated in this section and in §§

31-12-8

and

31-12-9

.

Upon establishment of the law enforcement agency accreditation council, the council shall adopt uniform rules and regulations to govern high speed pursuits in the state in accordance with the standards established by the National Law Enforcement Accreditation Agency. Until such rules are adopted, all police departments within the state shall submit to the department of the attorney general a copy of their high speed pursuit policies, which shall be available to the public.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-6

; P.L. 1990, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 64.

31-12-7.
Privileges allowed emergency vehicles.

The driver of an authorized emergency vehicle may:

Park or stand, irrespective of the provisions of any law;

Proceed past a red or stop signal or stop sign, but only after slowing down as may be necessary for safe operation;

Exceed the prima facie speed limits so long as he or she does not endanger life or property;

Disregard regulations governing direction of movement or turning in specified directions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 5; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-7

.

31-12-8.
Warning signals given by emergency vehicles.

The exemptions granted in this chapter to an authorized emergency vehicle shall apply only when the driver of the vehicle while in motion sounds an audible signal by bell, siren, or exhaust whistle as may be reasonably necessary, and when the vehicle is equipped with at least one lighted lamp displaying a red light visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of five hundred feet (500´) to the front of the vehicle, except that an authorized emergency vehicle operated as a police vehicle need not be equipped with or display a red light visible from in front of the vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-8

.

31-12-9.
Due care by emergency vehicles.

The provisions of this chapter shall not relieve the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons, nor shall the provisions protect the driver from the consequences of the driver’s reckless disregard for the safety of others.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-9

.

31-12-10.
Animals and animal-drawn vehicles.

Every person riding an animal or driving any animal-drawn vehicle upon a roadway shall be granted all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties applicable to the driver of a vehicle by chapters 12 — 27 of this title, except those provisions of those chapters which by their very nature can have no application.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-10

.

31-12-11.
Uniformity of application.

The provisions of chapters 12 — 27 of this title shall be applicable and uniform throughout this state and in all political subdivisions and municipalities in the state, and no local authority shall enact or enforce any ordinance, rule, or regulation in conflict with the provisions of chapters 12 — 27 of this title unless expressly authorized in them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-11

; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 57, § 5.

31-12-12.
Powers of local authorities.

The provisions of chapters 12 — 27 of this title shall not be deemed to prevent local authorities with respect to streets and highways under their jurisdiction and within the reasonable exercise of the police power from:

Regulating the standing or parking of vehicles;

Regulating traffic by means of police officers or traffic control signals;

Regulating or prohibiting processions or assemblages on the highways;

Designating particular highways as one-way highways and requiring that all vehicles on them be moved in one specific direction;

Regulating the speed of vehicles in public parks;

Designating any highway as a through highway and requiring that all vehicles stop before entering or crossing the highway or designating any intersection as a stop intersection and requiring all vehicles to stop at one or more entrances to the stop intersection;

Restricting the use of highways as authorized in §§

31-25-25

and

31-25-26

;

Regulating the operation of bicycles and requiring the registration and licensing of bicycles, including the requirement of a registration fee;

Regulating or prohibiting the turning of vehicles or specified types of vehicles at intersections;

Altering the prima facie speed limits as authorized by these chapters;

Adopting any other traffic regulations that are specifically authorized by chapters 12 — 27 of this title.

The city council of the city of Woonsocket is authorized and empowered to enact ordinances providing that the chief of police, or the police officers as he or she may from time to time designate, may impound, by means of a “Denver boot” or other immobilization device, or cause to be impounded, through the agency of a person or persons in the employ of the city of Woonsocket or the police department, or by independent contractor, any vehicle parked or standing on any part of any way under the control of the city, if in the calendar year in which the vehicle is so impounded and in the preceding calendar year, the aggregate of five (5) or more notices of violation of any ordinances adopted for the regulation of parking of motor vehicles (whether adopted prior to or subsequent to the passage of this chapter), have been affixed to the vehicle. The ordinance shall provide for a post-impoundment hearing which shall be held between the time of impoundment and not more than seven (7) days afterwards, at which any defense may be asserted. The ordinance may impose liability for the reasonable cost of the impoundment on the owner of the vehicle, and may provide that if a vehicle is so impounded, the vehicle shall be held until all fines and charges lawfully imposed for the impoundment have been paid. The police department shall promptly mail written notice to the registered owner of the impounded vehicle, directed to the address furnished by the division of motor vehicles or comparable agency of the state in which the vehicle is registered, stating the date on which the vehicle was impounded, the location at which it was impounded, and a statement that it will be released on the payment of all fines and charges lawfully imposed for the impoundment. If, after thirty (30) days of mailing of the notice to the registered owner as provided for in this subsection, the owner has not paid all fines and charges imposed for the impounding, the vehicle so impounded shall be deemed to have been abandoned and may be disposed of in accordance with §§

31-22-14

,

31-22-15

,

31-22-17

, and

31-22-18

, first applying the proceeds to pay all fines and charges imposed for the impoundment. Vehicles owned by the state or a political subdivision of it; by the United States or any instrumentality of it; or registered by a member of a foreign diplomatic corps or by a foreign consular officer who is a citizen of the United States and bearing a distinctive number plate or otherwise conspicuously marked as so owned or registered; and vehicles and persons described in §§

31-28-4

,

31-28-6

, and

31-28-7

; shall not, however, be subject to impoundment. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

The city council of the city of Warwick is authorized and empowered to enact ordinances providing that the chief of police, or the police officers as he or she may from time to time designate, may impound unregistered off-road recreational vehicles and snowmobiles that are unlawfully used on public roads and, after notice and hearing in the Warwick municipal court, may destroy such vehicles and snowmobiles so impounded. Further, the city council of the city of Warwick is authorized and empowered to enact ordinances prohibiting gasoline filling stations from selling gasoline and gasoline products to unregistered off-road recreational vehicles and snowmobiles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-12

; P.L. 1983, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 107; P.L. 2022, ch. 275, § 1, effective July 2, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 331, § 1, effective July 6, 2022.

31-12-13.
Local regulations to be posted.

No ordinance or regulation enacted under subdivision (a)(4), (a)(5), (a)(6), (a)(7), or (a)(10) of §

31-12-12

shall be effective until signs giving notice of the local traffic regulations are posted upon or at the entrances to the highway or part of it as may be most appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-13

.

31-12-14.
State approval for traffic control devices on state highways.

No local authority shall erect or maintain any stop sign or traffic control signal at any location so as to require the traffic on any state highway to stop before entering or crossing any intersecting highway unless approval in writing has first been obtained from the state traffic commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-14

; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 12; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 12.

31-12-15.
Powers of landowners preserved.

Nothing in chapters 1 — 27 of this title shall be construed to prevent the owner of real property used by the public for purposes of vehicular travel by permission of the owner and not as matter of right, from prohibiting such use, or from requiring other or different or additional conditions than those specified in chapters 12 — 27 of this title, or otherwise regulating such use as may seem best to the owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 21, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

31-12-15

.